Nebraska, session 109, LB1189.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1189 LB1189
2026 2026
Section 1. (1)(a) The You Earned It Pilot Program is created to
raise awareness of the earned income tax credit among low-income
Nebraskans. The purpose of the program is to increase access to and
utilization of the earned income tax credit by eligible individuals
through grants to qualifying nonprofit organizations. The program shall
be administered by the Department of Revenue.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate two hundred
fifty thousand dollars from the General Fund for fiscal year 2026-27 to
the department for carrying out the pilot program.
(2)(a) The Department of Revenue shall establish application
procedures, eligibility criteria, and reporting requirements for grant
recipients. Grant funds may be used for outreach, education, assistance,
and related activities that help eligible individuals understand, claim,
and receive the earned income tax credit. The department shall ensure
that grants are distributed in a manner that promotes geographic and
demographic equity across the state.
(b) Grants awarded under the You Earned It Pilot Program may be made
to nonprofit organizations that serve low-income Nebraskans, including,
but not limited to:
(i) Nonprofit tax preparation services;
(ii) Legal services organizations;
(iii) Health and human services organizations; and
(iv) Other nonprofit agencies that regularly work with low-income
Nebraskans and demonstrate the capacity to promote awareness of and
access to the earned income tax credit.
(c) Grants shall be awarded to eligible nonprofit organizations no
later than October 1, 2026.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall evaluate the success of the
program and electronically submit a report of such evaluation to the
Clerk of the Legislature on or before December 15, 2027, containing the
following information:
-2-

LB1189 LB1189
2026 2026
(a) The number and type of grants awarded;
(b) The geographic distribution of grant recipients;
(c) Outreach activities conducted;
(d) The estimated number of individuals assisted; and
(e) Findings and recommendations regarding the effectiveness of the
program and the advisability of continuation or expansion.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-